Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.100

Identification of contributions and communications. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

No contribution shall be made and no expenditure shall be incurred, directly or indirectly, in a fictitious name, anonymously, or by one person through an agent, relative, or other person in such a manner as to conceal the identity of the source of the contribution or in any other manner so as to effect concealment.

[ 2024 c 164 s 452; 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 8; 1973 c 1 s 12 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.435, 42.17.120.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.